Utah statutes.
75-5-402.   Protective proceedings -- Jurisdiction of affairs of protected persons.

After the service of notice in a proceeding seeking the appointment of a conservator or other protective order and until termination of the proceeding, the court in which the petition is filed has:

(1)  Exclusive jurisdiction to determine the need for a conservator or other protective order until the proceedings are terminated;

(2)  Exclusive jurisdiction to determine how the estate of the protected person which is subject to the laws of this state shall be managed, expended, or distributed to or for the use of the protected person or any of his dependents;

(3)  Concurrent jurisdiction to determine the validity of claims against the person or estate of the protected person and his title to any property or claim.

